test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-skeerm_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - sǩeeʹrm â-stem: # Noun 'kaulaliina' - full paradigm
     sǩeeʹrm+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: sǩeeʹrm
     sǩeeʹrm+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: sǩeeʹrm
     sǩeeʹrm+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: sǩeeʹrm
     sǩeeʹrm+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: sǩeerma
     sǩeeʹrm+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: sǩeeʹrmest
     sǩeeʹrm+N+Sg+Com+Indef: sǩeeʹrmin
     sǩeeʹrm+N+Ess+Indef: sǩeeʹrmen
     sǩeeʹrm+N+Par+Indef: sǩeeʹrmed
     sǩeeʹrm+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [sǩeeʹrmtaa, sǩeeʹrmtää]
     sǩeeʹrm+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: sǩeeʹrm
     sǩeeʹrm+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: sǩeeʹrmi
     sǩeeʹrm+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: sǩeeʹrmid
     sǩeeʹrm+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: sǩeeʹrmid
     sǩeeʹrm+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: sǩeeʹrmin
     sǩeeʹrm+N+Pl+Com+Indef: sǩeeʹrmivuiʹm
     sǩeeʹrm+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [sǩeeʹrmitaa, sǩeeʹrmitää]
